District of Columbia statutes.
42-1234

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-25, § 5, 52 DCR 8084

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act.